test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VLONG_manidoo_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px3manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: omanidooenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: omanidooenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: omanidooenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: imanidooensimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: imanidooensimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: imanidooensimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: imanidooensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: imanidooensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: imanidooensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: imanidooensimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: imanidooensimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: imanidooensimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: imanidooensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: imanidooensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: imanidooensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: imanidooensimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: imanidooensimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: imanidooensimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: imanidooensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: imanidooensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: imanidooensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: imanidooenhimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: imanidooenhimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: imanidooenhimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: imanidooenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: imanidooenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: imanidooenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: imanidooenhimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: imanidooenhimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: imanidooenhimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: imanidooenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: imanidooenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: imanidooenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: imanidooenhimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: imanidooenhimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: imanidooenhimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: imanidooenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: imanidooenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: imanidooenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
